Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.160

Rules.

The director may promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this chapter to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All rules shall be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2023 c 51 s 14; 1988 c 107 s 15.]

NOTES: